Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2104
Garbage disposal plants or systems and solid waste disposal areas; tax levy.

In a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village which purchases, constructs, maintains, or improves garbage disposal plants or systems or solid waste disposal areas pursuant to section 19-2101, the city council or village board of trustees shall levy annually a sufficient tax to maintain and operate such plant or system or solid waste disposal area and to provide for the payment of the interest on and principal of any bonds that may have been issued as provided in section 19-2103.

Laws 1947, c. 54, § 4, p. 184;

Laws 1969, c. 117, § 3, p. 534;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 133.